Massachusetts, session 194th, S2024.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (d) of Section 2 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, appearing in
the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subclause (I), the following
subclause:-
(J) An amount equal to the principal payments on education debts paid by an employer
on behalf of an employee who is a resident of the commonwealth; provided, however, that the
amount of the deduction shall not exceed $2,000. For purposes of this subclause, “education
debt” shall have the same meaning as defined in paragraph (12) of subsection (a) of Part B of
Section 3.
SECTION 2. Chapter 63 of the General Laws, as appearing the 2022 Official Edition,
shall hereby be amended by inserting after Section 38FF the following new section:-
of 2

Section 38GG. (a) For the purposes of this section, “education debt” shall have the same
meaning as defined in paragraph (12) of subsection (a) of Part B of Section 3 of Chapter 62.
(b) In determining the net income subject to tax under this chapter, a business corporation
shall be allowed a deduction of an amount equal to the principal payments on education debts
paid by the business corporation on behalf of an employee who is a resident of the
commonwealth; provided however, that the deduction taken for payments on education debts
paid on behalf of any individual employee shall not exceed $2,000.
of 2